Maryland, session 2026, HB1351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commission” means the Maryland Home Improvement Commission.
(c) “Contractor” means a person, other than an employee of an owner, who
performs or offers or agrees to perform a home improvement for an owner.
(d) “Contractor license” means a license issued by the Commission to act as a
contractor.
(E) “DISASTER MITIGATION SERVICES” INCLUDES:
(1) BOARDING UP WINDOWS OR DOORS TO SECURE A BUILDING;
(2) DEMOLITION OF A STRUCTURE TO PREVENT FURTHER DAMAGE;
(3) SETTING WATER MITIGATION EQUIPMENT;

HOUSE BILL 1351 3
(4) TARPING OR CAULKING A ROOF OR BUILDING AFTER DAMAGE;
AND
(5) SECURING A WALL OR ROOF TO PREVENT FURTHER DAMAGE.
[(e)] (F) “Fund” means the Home Improvement Guaranty Fund.
[(f)] (G) “Hearing board” means a home improvement hearing board appointed
by the Commission under § 8–313 of this title.
[(g)] (H) (1) “Home improvement” means:
(i) 1. the addition to or alteration, conversion, improvement,
modernization, remodeling, repair, or replacement of a building or part of a building that
is used or designed to be used as a residence or dwelling place or a structure adjacent to
that building; or
[(ii)] 2. an improvement to land adjacent to the building; OR
(II) THE PROVISION OF DISASTER MITIGATION SERVICES FOR A
BUILDING OR PART OF A BUILDING THAT IS USED OR DESIGNED TO BE USED AS A
RESIDENCE OR DWELLING PLACE OR A STRUCTURE ADJACENT TO THAT BUILDING.
(2) “Home improvement” includes:
(i) construction, improvement, or replacement, on land adjacent to
the building, of a driveway, fall–out shelter, fence, garage, landscaping, deck, pier, porch,
or swimming pool;
(ii) a shore erosion control project, as defined under § 8–1001 of the
Natural Resources Article, for a residential property;
(iii) connection, installation, or replacement, in the building or
structure, of a dishwasher, disposal, or refrigerator with an icemaker to existing exposed
household plumbing lines;
(iv) installation, in the building or structure, of an awning, fire
alarm, or storm window; and
(v) work done on individual condominium units;
(VI) WORK DONE ON TREES, INCLUDING REMOVAL SERVICES;
AND
(VII) WATER REMEDIATION SERVICES THAT RESTORE, CLEAN,
SANITIZE, OR RETURN A PROPERTY TO BE SAFE AND HABITABLE.

HOUSE BILL 1351
(3) “Home improvement” does not include:
(i) construction of a new home;
(ii) work done to comply with a guarantee of completion for a new
building project;
(iii) connection, installation, or replacement of an appliance to
existing exposed plumbing lines that requires alteration of the plumbing lines;
(iv) sale of materials, if the seller does not arrange to perform or does
not perform directly or indirectly any work in connection with the installation or application
of the materials;
(v) work done on apartment buildings that contain four or more
single–family units; or
(vi) work done on the commonly owned areas of condominiums.
[(h)] (I) “Home improvement contract” means an oral or written agreement
between a contractor and owner for the contractor to perform a home improvement.
[(i)] (J) (1) “License” means, except where it refers to a license other than
one issued under this title, a license issued by the Commission.
(2) “License” includes:
(i) a contractor license; and
(ii) a salesperson license.
[(j)] (K) “Licensed contractor” means a person who is licensed by the
Commission to act as a contractor.
[(k)] (L) “Owner” includes a homeowner, tenant, or other person who buys,
contracts for, orders, or is entitled to a home improvement.
[(l)] (M) “Salesperson” means a person who sells a home improvement.
[(m)] (N) “Salesperson license” means a license issued by the Commission to sell
a home improvement.
[(n)] (O) “Sell a home improvement” means:

HOUSE BILL 1351 5
(1) to negotiate or offer to negotiate a home improvement contract with an
owner; or
(2) to seek to get a home improvement contract from an owner.
[(o)] (P) “Subcontractor” means a person, other than a laborer or supplier of
materials, who makes an oral or written agreement with:
(1) a contractor to perform all or part of a home improvement contract; or
(2) another subcontractor to perform all or part of a subcontract to a home
improvement contract.
8–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a person must have a contractor
license whenever the person acts as a contractor in the State.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a person must have a salesperson
license or contractor license whenever the person sells a home improvement in the State.
(c) This section does not apply to:
(6) a marine contractor licensed under Title 17, Subtitle 3 of the
Environment Article; [or]
(7) a person who is selling a home improvement to be performed by a
person described in item (4) of this subsection; OR
(8) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1, 2028, A HOME IMPROVEMENT
CONTRACTOR THAT PROVIDES DISASTER MITIGATING SERVICES IF THE HOME
IMPROVEMENT CONTRACTOR:
(I) COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 8–501.1 OF THIS
TITLE;
(II) IS SUBSTANTIALLY WORKING TOWARD A LICENSE; AND
(III) IF THE HOME IMPROVEMENT CONTRACTOR IS A COMPANY,
CORPORATION, OR OTHER ENTITY, FORMED, INCORPORATED, OR REGISTERED IN
THE STATE ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026.
8–501.
(c) (1) In addition to any other matters on which the parties lawfully agree,
each home improvement contract shall contain:

HOUSE BILL 1351
(viii) a notice that gives the telephone number and website of the
Commission and states that:
1. each contractor must be licensed by the Commission; and
2. anyone may ask the Commission about a contractor; [and]
(ix) a notice set by the Commission by regulation that:
1. specifies the protections available to consumers through
the Commission; and
2. advises the consumer of the right to purchase a
performance bond for additional protection against loss; AND
(X) IF THE CONTRACT IS FOR THE PROVISION OF DISASTER
MITIGATION SERVICES, NOTICE OF THE OWNER’S RIGHT TO RESCIND THE CONTRACT
UNDER § 8–501.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) If payment for work performed under the home improvement contract
will be secured by an interest in residential real estate, a written notice in not smaller than
10 point bold type that is on the first page of the contract shall state in substantially the
following form: “This contract creates a mortgage or lien against your property to secure
payment and may cause a loss of your property if you fail to pay the amount agreed upon.
You have the right to consult an attorney. You have the right to rescind this contract within
3 business days after the date you sign it by notifying the contractor in writing that you are
rescinding the contract.”
(3) The notice under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
independently initialed by the homeowner.
(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a home
improvement contract for the installation of a solar energy generating system on the roof
of a building shall include the installation of a barrier that meets industry standards to
prevent wildlife intrusion and damage to the solar energy generating system or the
underlying roof.
(2) A home improvement contract for the installation of a solar energy
generating system on the roof of a building is not required to include the installation of a
barrier as specified under paragraph (1) of this subsection if the customer has waived the
installation of the barrier after being informed of the cost of the barrier and the risks of not
installing a wildlife barrier.
8–501.1.

HOUSE BILL 1351 7
(A) (1) IF NOTWITHSTANDING TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE, IF A HOME IMPROVEMENT CONTRACTOR SOLICITS AN
OWNER AND THE OWNER SIGNS A CONTRACT FOR DISASTER MITIGATING SERVICES,
THE OWNER MAY RESCIND THE CONTRACT:
(I) IF THE OWNER IS UNDER THE AGE OF 65 YEARS, WITHIN 5
DAYS AFTER ENTERING INTO THE CONTRACT; OR
(II) IF THE OWNER IS AT LEAST 65 YEARS OLD, WITHIN 7 DAYS
AFTER ENTERING INTO THE CONTRACT.
(2) AN OWNER THAT RESCINDS A HOME IMPROVEMENT CONTRACT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO PAY MORE THAN THE
AMOUNT INDICATED AND INITIALED BY THE OWNER, IN THE CONTRACT. FAIR AND
REASONABLE VALUE OF THE NECESSARY WORK PERFORMED UNDER THE CONTRACT
PRIOR TO THE OWNER RESCINDING THE CONTRACT.
(B) A HOME IMPROVEMENT CONTRACT FOR DISASTER MITIGATION
SERVICES SHALL:
(1) COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 14–302 OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING LANGUAGE, WHICH SHALL BE
INITIALED BY THE OWNER:
“DURING THE FIRST 5 DAYS AFTER THIS CONTRACT IS SIGNED, THE OWNER
HAS THE RIGHT TO RESCIND THE CONTRACT AND BE LIABLE ONLY FOR AN AMOUNT
NOT TO EXCEED $_______(FILL IN AMOUNT) AND _____ (OWNER INITIALS).”. THE
FAIR AND REASONABLE VALUE OF THE NECESSARY WORK PERFORMED UNDER THE
CONTRACT PRIOR TO THE OWNER RESCINDING THE CONTRACT.”.
8–507.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DISASTER” MEANS A SERIOUS EVENT THAT:
(1) CAUSES HARM TO A HOME, BUILDING, OR OTHER STRUCTURE; AND
(2) REQUIRES EMERGENCY RESPONSE SERVICES.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A CONTRACTOR, OR A PERSON
ACTING ON BEHALF OF A CONTRACTOR, WHO IS ENGAGED IN AN ONGOING BUSINESS
RELATIONSHIP, OTHER THAN MERE SOLICITATION, WITH A VICTIM OF A DISASTER
BEFORE THE DISASTER OCCURS.

HOUSE BILL 1351
(C) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE EXISTENCE OF A DISASTER IS
NOT CONTINGENT ON THE DECLARATION OF A STATE OF EMERGENCY BY THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR THE GOVERNOR UNDER § 14–107 OF THE PUBLIC
SAFETY ARTICLE, OR A LOCAL DISASTER DECLARATION AS DEFINED UNDER §
14–110.5 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(D) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR THE MAYOR AND CITY
COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY MAY IMPOSE LIMITATIONS ON
IN–PERSON SOLICITATION OF A VICTIM OF A DISASTER BY A CONTRACTOR
OFFERING DISASTER MITIGATION SERVICES, INCLUDING LIMITATIONS ON THE
HOURS DURING WHICH AND AREAS WITHIN WHICH IN–PERSON SOLICITATION MAY
OCCUR.
Article – Insurance
27–407.2.
It is a fraudulent insurance act for a contractor offering home repair or remodeling
services for damages to a private residence, to directly or indirectly pay or otherwise
compensate an insured, or offer or promise to pay or compensate an insured[, with the
intent to defraud an insurer,] for any part of the insured’s deductible under the insured’s
property or casualty insurance policy, if payment for the services will be made from the
proceeds of the policy.
27–407.3.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CONTRACTOR” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 8–101
OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
(B) IT IS A FRAUDULENT INSURANCE ACT FOR A CONTRACTOR OR PROVIDER
OF SERVICES FOR THE REPAIR OR REPLACEMENT OF A RESIDENTIAL STRUCTURE TO
PROVIDE A PAYMENT, REFERRAL FEE, REBATE, GIFT, OR ANYTHING OF VALUE TO AN
INSURED OR A CLAIMANT IN CONNECTION WITH A CLAIM.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROHIBITS A CONTRACTOR FROM PAYING A
REFERRAL FEE OR COMMISSION TO ANOTHER CONTRACTOR OR BUSINESS ENTITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.